Massachusetts, session 194th, S2026.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 63 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “compensation” the
following definition:-
“Compensation ratio” for a taxable year means a ratio where the numerator is the amount
equal to the greater of the compensation of the chief executive officer or the highest paid
employee of the business for the calendar year preceding the beginning of the taxable year and
the denominator is the amount equal to the median compensation of all employees employed by
the business, including all contracted employees under contract with the business, in the United
States for the calendar year preceding the beginning of the taxable year.
of 2

SECTION 2. Section 2 of said chapter 63 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting the following subsection:-
(e) Except as provided in (b) and (d), For taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
2027, the tax imposed under this section upon financial institutions whose compensation ratio
exceeds 100, the sum of the of subsection (a) and an additional 2 per cent of the corporation’s net
income determined to be taxable in accordance with this chapter.
SECTION 3. Section 39 of said chapter 63 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting the following subsection:-
(c) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, the tax imposed under this
section upon a publicly held corporation, as defined in Section 162(m)(2) of the Internal
Revenue Code, relating to publicly held corporation whose compensation ratio exceeds 100, the
sum of the total excise levied in subsection (a) and an additional 2 per cent of the corporation’s
net income determined to be taxable in accordance with this chapter.
of 2